en: Metronome display style: App screen display; Blinking LED only; Numeric display (LCD); Numeric display (LED); Pendulum/needle scale; Other
es: Tipo de visualización del metrónomo: Pantalla de app; Solo LED parpadeante; Pantalla numérica (LCD); Pantalla numérica (LED); Péndulo/escala de aguja; Otro
hr-HR: Stil prikaza metronoma: Zaslon aplikacije; Samo trepereća LED dioda; Numerički zaslon (LCD); Numerički zaslon (LED); Ljestvica s njihalom/iglom; Ostalo
nl: Metronoom weergavestijl: App-schermweergave; Alleen knipperende led; Numeriek display (LCD); Numeriek display (LED); Slinger-/naaldschaal; Overige
pl: Styl wyświetlania metronomu: Ekran aplikacji; Tylko migająca dioda LED; Wyświetlacz numeryczny (LCD); Wyświetlacz numeryczny (LED); Skala wahadłowa/igłowa; Inne
ja: メトロノーム表示スタイル: アプリ画面表示; LED点滅のみ; 数値表示 (LCD); 数値表示 (LED); 振り子/目盛り; その他
da: Metronomens visningsstil: Visning på app-skærm; Kun blinkende LED; Numerisk visning (LCD); Numerisk visning (LED); Pendul-/nål-skala; Andet
th: รูปแบบการแสดงผลเมโทรโนม: การแสดงผลบนหน้าจอแอป; ไฟ LED กะพริบเท่านั้น; หน้าจอตัวเลข (LCD); หน้าจอตัวเลข (LED); หน้าปัดลูกตุ้ม/เข็ม; อื่นๆ
fi: Metronomin näyttötapa: Sovelluksen näyttöruutu; Vain vilkkuva LED; Numeerinen näyttö (LCD); Numeerinen näyttö (LED); Heiluri-/neula-asteikko; Muu
vi: Kiểu hiển thị máy đếm nhịp: Màn hình ứng dụng; Chỉ đèn LED nhấp nháy; Màn hình số (LCD); Màn hình số (LED); Con lắc/kim chỉ; Khác
ru: Стиль отображения метронома: Экран приложения; Только мигающий светодиод; Цифровой дисплей (ЖК); Цифровой дисплей (LED); Маятник / шкала со стрелкой; Другое
bg-BG: Стил на показване на метроном: Екран на приложението; Само мигащ LED; Цифров дисплей (LCD); Цифров дисплей (LED); Скала с махало/стрелка; Друго
sl-SI: Stil prikaza metronoma: Zaslon aplikacije; Samo utripajoča LED lučka; Številčni zaslon (LCD); Številčni zaslon (LED); Nihalo/skala s kazalcem; Drugo
hu: Metronóm megjelenítési stílusa: Alkalmazás képernyője; Csak villogó LED; Számkijelzős (LCD); Számkijelzős (LED); Inga/mutatós skála; Egyéb
cs: Styl zobrazení metronomu: Zobrazení na obrazovce aplikace; Pouze blikající LED; Číselný displej (LCD); Číselný displej (LED); Stupnice s kyvadlem / jehlou; Jiné
ko: 메트로놈 표시 스타일: 앱 화면 디스플레이; LED 점멸 전용; 숫자 디스플레이(LCD); 숫자 디스플레이(LED); 진자/바늘 스케일; 기타
el: Στυλ εμφάνισης μετρονόμου: Οθόνη εφαρμογής; Μόνο LED που αναβοσβήνει; Αριθμητική οθόνη (LCD); Αριθμητική οθόνη (LED); Κλίμακα με εκκρεμές/βελόνα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Estilo de exibição do metrónomo: Exibição no ecrã da app; Apenas LED intermitente; Visor numérico (LCD); Visor numérico (LED); Escala de pêndulo/agulha; Outro
ro-RO: Stilul de afișare al metronomului: Afișaj pe ecranul aplicației; Doar LED intermitent; Afișaj numeric (LCD); Afișaj numeric (LED); Scală cu pendul/ac; Altele
lt-LT: Metronomo ekrano stilius: Programėlės ekrano rodinys; Tik mirksintis LED; Skaitmeninis ekranas (LCD); Skaitmeninis ekranas (LED); Švytuoklės / rodyklės skalė; Kita
de: Stil der Metronomanzeige: App-Bildschirmanzeige; Nur blinkende LED; Numerische Anzeige (LCD); Numerische Anzeige (LED); Pendel-/Nadelskala; Sonstiges
it: Stile del display del metronomo: Schermo app; Solo LED lampeggiante; Display numerico (LCD); Display numerico (LED); Scala a pendolo/ago; Altro
sv: Metronomens visningsstil: Appskärmvisning; Endast blinkande LED; Numerisk display (LCD); Numerisk display (LED); Pendel/nålskala; Annat
fr: Mode d’affichage du métronome: Affichage sur écran d’appli; LED clignotante uniquement; Affichage numérique (LCD); Affichage numérique (LED); Pendule/Aiguille; Autre
zh-CN: 节拍器显示方式: 应用屏幕显示; 仅 LED 闪烁; 数字显示 (LCD); 数字显示 (LED); 钟摆/指针刻度; 其他
nb: Metronomvisningsstil: Visning på appskjerm; Kun blinkende LED; Numerisk visning (LCD); Numerisk visning (LED); Pendel-/nåleskala; Annet
pt-BR: Metrônomo estilo de exibição: Exibição na tela do app; Apenas LED piscante; Visor numérico (LCD); Visor numérico (LED); Escala de pêndulo/agulha; Outro
tr: Metronom gösterim tipi: Uygulama ekranı görüntüsü; Yalnızca yanıp sönen LED; Sayısal ekran (LCD); Sayısal ekran (LED); Sarkaç/ibre ölçeği; Diğer
zh-TW: 節拍器顯示樣式: app 螢幕顯示; 僅 LED 閃爍; 數字顯示 (LCD); 數字顯示 (LED); 鐘擺/指針刻度; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl zobrazenia metronómu: Displej aplikácie; Len blikajúca LED; Číselný displej (LCD); Číselný displej (LED); Kyvadlo/ručička; Iné